District of Columbia statutes.
21-304

Transfer by gift or exercise of power of appointment.

A person may make a transfer by irrevocable gift to, or the irrevocable exercise of a power of appointment in favor of, a custodian for the benefit of a minor pursuant to section 21-309 .

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
This section is referenced in § 21-309, § 21-315, § 21-318, and § 21-320.
1981 Ed., § 21-304.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.